minidel.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-

# The system encoded in the script consists of a Gen function
# that produces a vast number of output candidates for each input
# word. The candidates are subject to nine ranked optimality
# constraints: Clash, AlignLeft, MainStress, FootBin, Lapse, NonFinal,
# StressToWeight, Parse, and AllFeetFirst.

# Lenient composition is used to guarantee that at least one output
# form survives, no matter how suboptimal it is.

################################## DATA ##################################

define ToastWords {tata} | {tatta} | {ta} | {tattatta} ;

######################### BASIC DEFINITIONS #############################

# Finnish has many vowels
# Our sample language has one, /a/
define V [ a ] ;

# Finnish has many consonants
# Our sample language has one, t
define C [ t ] ;                                   # Consonant


################################### GEN ##################################

# Insight?
# It doesn't matter where we place the %+Del mark - we just count them
# So ... hmm, not sure this will work
# Because it's applying to two different consonants
# And thus giving us two different but equivalent outputs with the same
# violation profiles
# t a +Del t a
# t a t +Del a
# On the other hand ...
# If we map both of those to
# +Del t a t a
# Then we're set

# Creates equivalent forms - move %+Del to beginning
#define Deletion [ C (->) %+Del ];
# Doesn't actually delete C
#define Deletion [ ?+ (->) %+Del ... || .#. _ C ];
# Prefixes +Del regardless of whether or not deletion took place
#define Deletion [ C (->) 0 ] .o. [? -> %+Del ... || .#. _ ]]
# This notation allows multiple optional operations to be grouped - 
# if I can get the syntax right
# See http://www.stanford.edu/~laurik/fsmbook/errata/optional-replacement.html
# Gives right results for up to three t's
#define Deletion [[ []:%+Del ?* t:0 ?* ] | ?* .o.
#[ []:%+Del \t+ t:0 ?* ] | ?*  .o. 
#[ []:%+Del \t+ t:0 ?* ] | ?*  
#] .o. 
#~[ ?* \[%+Del]  %+Del ?*];

# Can replace ?* t:0 ?* with $[t:0], looks like
define Deletion [[ []:%+Del ?* t:0 ?* ] | ?* .o.
[ []:%+Del ?* t:0 ?* ] | ?*  .o. 
[ []:%+Del ?* t:0 ?* ] | ?*  
] .o. 
~[ ?* \[%+Del]  %+Del ?*];
# In keeping with the idea of "richness of the base", the Gen
# function produces a great number of output candidates for
# even short words. Long words have millions of possible outputs.

define Gen [ Deletion ];

######################### OT CONSTRAINTS #############################

# We use asterisks to mark constraint violations. Ordinary constraints
# such as Lapse assign single asterisks as the violation marks and the
# candidate with the fewest number is selected. Gradient constraints
# such as AllFeetFirst mark violations with sequences of asterisks.
# The number increases with distance from the word edge.

# Every instance of * in an output candidate is a violation.

define Viol ${*};

# We prune candidates with "lenient composition" that eliminates
# candidates that violate the constraint provided that at least
# one output candidate survives.

define Viol0 ~Viol;        # No violations
define Viol1 ~[Viol^2];    # At most one violation
define Viol2 ~[Viol^3];    # At most two violations
define Viol3 ~[Viol^4];    # etc.
define Viol4 ~[Viol^5];
define Viol5 ~[Viol^6];
define Viol6 ~[Viol^7];
define Viol7 ~[Viol^8];
define Viol8 ~[Viol^9];
define Viol9 ~[Viol^10];
define Viol10 ~[Viol^11];
define Viol11 ~[Viol^12];
define Viol12 ~[Viol^13];
define Viol13 ~[Viol^14];
define Viol14 ~[Viol^15];
define Viol15 ~[Viol^16];

# This eliminates the violation marks after the candidate set has
# been pruned by a constraint.

define Pardon {*} -> 0;

########################## CONSTRAINTS ##############################

define MAX [ %+Del -> ... {*}] ;

define NoGem [ t t -> ... {*}] ;

########################## CONSTRAINTS ##############################

define Pretty [ %+Del ] -> 0;

########################## Evaluation ######################################

echo ### Computing the prosody for ToastWords

# Some constraints can always be satisfied; some constraints are
# violated many times. The limits have been chosen to produce
# a unique winner in all the 25 test cases in FinnWords.

regex [ToastWords .o. Gen
.o. NoGem .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. MAX .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. Pretty
      ];

#print lower-words

echo # Down {ta}
down ta
echo # Down {tata}
down tata
echo # Down {tatta}
down tatta
# Why is this acting strange?  Is it because it can never reach that last t?
echo # Down tattatta
down tattatta

# Problem: set of candidates, some of which have more violations than othersjjjj
